New Jersey, session 221, A2729.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    If one or more commission agencies are overcrowded and experiencing service delays, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall utilize mobile units to reduce service delays and to assist in processing customer transactions. If the commission has fewer mobile units than the number of commission agencies that are overcrowded and are experiencing service delays, then the commission shall utilize the mobile units in a manner that maximizes the number of individuals the commission is able to serve or provides the greatest reduction in service delays. For the purposes of this section, mobile unit shall mean a portable commission agency that provides commission agency services. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.